Washington statutes.
RCW 41.68.030

Submittal of claim.

A claim under this chapter may be submitted to the department of enterprise services for the reparation of salary losses suffered during the years 1942 through 1947. The claim shall be supported by appropriate verification, such as the person's name at the time of the dismissal, the name of the employing department, and a social security number, or by evidence of official action of termination. The claimant shall also provide an address to which the department shall mail notification of its determination regarding the claimant's eligibility.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 474; 1983 1st ex.s. c 15 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.